North Carolina, session 2025, HB526.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred nine thousand dollars ($209,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Onslow County
to establish a drug testing laboratory at the Sheriff's Office to ensure timely and accurate drug
testing results for law enforcement purposes.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H526-v-1*